Yamls/Pron-mukod_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
#  The were proofread for golden standard by Larisa Ponomareva 2019-10-22
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


    Pronoun – мукӧд: # Indefinite Pronoun 'Joku, muu / Иной'
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: мукӧд
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Der/моз: мукӧдмоз
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Der/кодь: мукӧдкодь
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: [мукӧдӧ, мукӧдӧс]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: мукӧдлӧн
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl: мукӧдлісь
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat: мукӧдлӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins: мукӧдӧн 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: мукӧдкӧт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car: мукӧдтӧг
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns: мукӧдла
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr: мукӧдся
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: мукӧдын
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: мукӧдісь
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: мукӧдӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr: мукӧдлань
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr: мукӧдсянь
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl: мукӧдӧт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI: мукӧдӧдз
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII: мукӧдви
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne: мукӧдланьын
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla: мукӧдланись
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll: мукӧдланьӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr: мукӧдланьсянь
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl: мукӧдланьӧт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI: мукӧдланьӧдз
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII: мукӧдланьви

    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: мукӧдӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: мукӧдӧс
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: мукӧдӧлӧн
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: мукӧдӧлісь
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: мукӧдӧлӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: мукӧднам 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+PxSg1: мукӧдӧкӧт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car+PxSg1: мукӧдӧтӧг
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns+PxSg1: мукӧдӧла
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1: мукӧдӧся
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: мукӧдам
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: мукӧдсим
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: мукӧдам
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr+PxSg1: [мукӧдӧлань, мукӧдланям] 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr+PxSg1: [мукӧдӧсянь, мукӧдсяням]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: [мукӧдӧттям, мукӧдӧттим]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI+PxSg1: [мукӧдӧдззам, мукӧдӧдззим]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII+PxSg1: мукӧдӧви
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne+PxSg1: [мукӧдланям, мукӧдӧланьын]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla+PxSg1: [мукӧдланьсим, мукӧдӧланись]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll+PxSg1: [мукӧдланям, мукӧдӧланьӧ]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg1: [мукӧдӧланьсянь, мукӧдланьсяням]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg1: [мукӧдланьӧттям, мукӧдланьӧттим, мукӧдӧланьӧт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg1: [мукӧдланьӧдззам, мукӧдланьӧдззим, мукӧдӧланьӧдз]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg1: мукӧдӧланьви

    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: мукӧдыт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: мукӧдтӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: мукӧдытлӧн
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: мукӧдытлісь
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: мукӧдытлӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: мукӧднат 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+PxSg2: мукӧдыткӧт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car+PxSg2: мукӧдыттӧг
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns+PxSg2: мукӧдытла
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg2: мукӧдытся
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: мукӧдат
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: мукӧдсит
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: мукӧдат
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: [мукӧдытлань, мукӧдланят] 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: [мукӧдытсянь, мукӧдсянят]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: [мукӧдӧттят, мукӧдӧттит]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI+PxSg2: [мукӧдӧдззат, мукӧдӧдззит]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII+PxSg2: мукӧдытви
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne+PxSg2: [мукӧдланят, мукӧдытланьын]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla+PxSg2: [мукӧдланьсит, мукӧдытланись]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll+PxSg2: [мукӧдланят, мукӧдытланьӧ]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg2: [мукӧдытланьсянь, мукӧдланьсянят]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg2: [мукӧдланьӧттят, мукӧдланьӧттит, мукӧдытланьӧт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg2: [мукӧдланьӧдззат, мукӧдланьӧдззит, мукӧдытланьӧдз]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg2: мукӧдытланьви


    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: мукӧдыс
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: мукӧдсӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: мукӧдыслӧн
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: мукӧдыслісь
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: мукӧдыслӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: мукӧднас 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+PxSg3: мукӧдыскӧт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car+PxSg3: мукӧдыстӧг
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: мукӧдысла
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3: мукӧдысся
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: мукӧдас
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: мукӧдсис
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: мукӧдас
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: [мукӧдыслань, мукӧдланяс] 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: [мукӧдыссянь, мукӧдсяняс]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: [мукӧдӧттяс, мукӧдӧттис]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI+PxSg3: [мукӧдӧдззас, мукӧдӧдззис]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII+PxSg3: мукӧдысви
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne+PxSg3: [мукӧдланяс, мукӧдысланьын]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla+PxSg3: [мукӧдланьсис, мукӧдысланись]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll+PxSg3: [мукӧдланяс, мукӧдысланьӧ]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg3: [мукӧдысланьсянь, мукӧдланьсяняс]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg3: [мукӧдланьӧттяс, мукӧдланьӧттис, мукӧдысланьӧт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg3: [мукӧдланьӧдззас, мукӧдланьӧдззис, мукӧдысланьӧдз]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg3: мукӧдысланьви

    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: мукӧдным
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: мукӧднымӧс
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: мукӧднымлӧн
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: мукӧднымлісь
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: мукӧднымлӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: мукӧднаным 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+PxPl1: мукӧднымкӧт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car+PxPl1: мукӧднымтӧг
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns+PxPl1: мукӧднымла
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl1: мукӧднымся
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: мукӧданым
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: мукӧдсиным
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: мукӧданым
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: [мукӧднымлань, мукӧдланяным]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: [мукӧднымсянь, мукӧдсяняным]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: [мукӧдӧттяным, мукӧдӧттиным]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI+PxPl1: [мукӧдӧдззаным, мукӧдӧдззиным] 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII+PxPl1: мукӧднымви
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne+PxPl1: [мукӧдланяным, мукӧднымланьын]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla+PxPl1: [мукӧдланьсиным, мукӧднымланись]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll+PxPl1: [мукӧдланяным, мукӧднымланьӧ]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl1: [мукӧднымланьсянь, мукӧдланьсяняным]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl1: [мукӧдланьӧттяным, мукӧдланьӧттиным, мукӧднымланьӧт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl1: [мукӧдланьӧдззаным, мукӧдланьӧдззиным, мукӧднымланьӧдз] 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl1: мукӧднымланьви


    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: мукӧдныт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: мукӧднытӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: мукӧднытлӧн
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: мукӧднытлісь
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: мукӧднытлӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: мукӧднаныт 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+PxPl2: мукӧдныткӧт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car+PxPl2: мукӧдныттӧг
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns+PxPl2: мукӧднытла
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl2: мукӧднытся
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: мукӧданыт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: мукӧдсиныт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: мукӧданыт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr+PxPl2: [мукӧднытлань, мукӧдланяныт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: [мукӧднытсянь, мукӧдсяняныт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: [мукӧдӧттяныт, мукӧдӧттиныт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI+PxPl2: [мукӧдӧдззаныт, мукӧдӧдззиныт] 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII+PxPl2: мукӧднытви
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne+PxPl2: [мукӧдланяныт, мукӧднытланьын]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla+PxPl2: [мукӧдланьсиныт, мукӧднытланись]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll+PxPl2: [мукӧдланяныт, мукӧднытланьӧ]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl2: [мукӧднытланьсянь, мукӧдланьсяняныт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl2: [мукӧдланьӧттяныт, мукӧдланьӧттиныт, мукӧднытланьӧт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl2: [мукӧдланьӧдззаныт, мукӧдланьӧдззиныт, мукӧднытланьӧдз] 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl2: мукӧднытланьви


    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: мукӧдныс
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: мукӧднысӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: мукӧдныслӧн
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: мукӧдныслісь
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: мукӧдныслӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: мукӧднаныс 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+PxPl3: мукӧдныскӧт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car+PxPl3: мукӧдныстӧг
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns+PxPl3: мукӧднысла
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3: мукӧднысся
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: мукӧданыс
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: мукӧдсиныс
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: мукӧданыс
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: [мукӧдныслань, мукӧдланяныс]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: [мукӧдныссянь, мукӧдсяняныс]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: [мукӧдӧттяныс, мукӧдӧттиныс]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI+PxPl3: [мукӧдӧдззаныс, мукӧдӧдззиныс] 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII+PxPl3: мукӧднысви
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne+PxPl3: [мукӧдланяныс, мукӧднысланьын]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla+PxPl3: [мукӧдланьсиныс, мукӧднысланись]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll+PxPl3: [мукӧдланяныс, мукӧднысланьӧ]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl3: [мукӧднысланьсянь, мукӧдланьсяняныс]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl3: [мукӧдланьӧттяныс, мукӧдланьӧттиныс, мукӧднысланьӧт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl3: [мукӧдланьӧдззаныс, мукӧдланьӧдззиныс, мукӧднысланьӧдз] 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl3: мукӧднысланьви

    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: мукӧддэз
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: мукӧддэзӧс
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: мукӧддэзлӧн
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl: мукӧддэзлісь
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat: мукӧддэзлӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins: мукӧддэзӧн 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: мукӧддэзкӧт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car: мукӧддэзтӧг
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns: мукӧддэзла
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr: мукӧддэзся
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: мукӧддэзын
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: мукӧддэзісь
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: мукӧддэзӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr: мукӧддэзлань
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr: мукӧддэзсянь
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl: мукӧддэзӧт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI: мукӧддэзӧдз
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII: мукӧддэзви
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne: мукӧддэзланьын
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEla: мукӧддэзланись
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll: мукӧддэзланьӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr: мукӧддэзланьсянь
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl: мукӧддэзланьӧт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI: мукӧддэзланьӧдз
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII: мукӧддэзланьви
